ja: 統合ストレージ機能: アクセサリー棚; ボール収納; ブリッジフック; チョークホルダー; キュークリップ（交換用）; ドリンクホルダー; ナインボールラックホルダー; スコアボード; トライアングルラックホルダー; その他
zh-TW: 內建收納功能: 配件層架; 台球收納; 架桿鉤; 巧克座; 球桿夾替換件; 飲料座; 九號球排球框架; 記分板; 三角排球框架; 其他
bg-BG: Интегрирани функции за съхранение: Рафт за аксесоари; Място за съхранение на топки; Кука за помощна щека; Държач за креда; Резервни щипки за щека; Поставка за напитки; Държач за рамка за 9 топки; Табло за резултати; Държач за триъгълник; Други
tr: Entegre depolama özellikleri: Aksesuar rafı; Top haznesi; Köprü kancası; Tebeşir tutucu; Yedek ıstaka klipsleri; İçecek tutucu; Dokuz top üçgeni tutucu; Skorbord; Üçgen top dizici tutucu; Diğer
ru: Интегрированные особенности хранения: Полка для аксессуаров; Хранение шаров; Крюк для мостика; Держатель для мела; Запасные зажимы для киев; Держатель для напитков; Держатель для ромба; Табло; Держатель для треугольника; Другое
zh-CN: 集成储物功能: 配件搁架; 储球区; 架杆钩; 巧粉架; 替换球杆夹; 饮料杯托; 九球摆球框架; 记分板; 三角摆球框架; 其他
vi: Tính năng lưu trữ tích hợp: Kệ để phụ kiện; Ngăn để bóng; Móc treo gậy bridge; Khay để lơ; Kẹp giữ cơ thay thế; Khay để ly; Khay để khuôn bóng 9; Bảng ghi điểm; Khay để khuôn bóng tam giác; Khác
pl: Zintegrowane funkcje przechowywania: Półka na akcesoria; Miejsce na bile; Hak na podpórkę (mostek); Uchwyt na kredę; Zapasowe klipsy na kije; Uchwyt na napój; Uchwyt na trójkąt do 9-bil; Tablica wyników; Uchwyt na trójkąt; Inne
pt-PT: Recursos de armazenamento integrados: Prateleira para acessórios; Arrumação de bolas; Gancho para rabeta; Suporte para giz; Substituições de clipes para tacos; Suporte para bebidas; Suporte para losango de bola nove; Marcador; Suporte para triângulo; Outro
pt-BR: Recursos de armazenamento integrados: Prateleira para acessórios; Armazenamento de bolas; Gancho ponte; Porta-giz; Clipes de substituição para taco; Porta-copos; Suporte de rack para bola 9; Placar; Suporte para rack de triângulo; Outros
da: Integrerede opbevaringsfunktioner: Tilbehørshylde; Opbevaring til bolde; Krog til bro; Kridtholder; Nye kø-klemmer; Kopholder; Holder til 9-ball-trekant; Pointtavle; Holder til trekant; Andet
fi: Integroidut säilytysominaisuudet: Tarvikehylly; Pallojen säilytystila; Siltakoukku; Liidunpidike; Vaihtoklipsit biljardikepille; Juomapidike; Ysipallopakan pidike; Tuloslaulu; Kolmiopakan pidike; Muu
en: Integrated storage features: Accessory shelf; Ball storage; Bridge hook; Chalk holder; Cue clip replacements; Drink holder; Nine-ball rack holder; Scoreboard; Triangle rack holder; Other
nb: Integrerte lagringsfunksjoner: Tilbehørshylle; Balloppbevaring; Brokrok; Krittholder; Erstatningsklips for kø; Drikkeholder; Holder for ni-ball-rack; Poengtavle; Holder for triangelrack; Annet
sv: Integrerade förvaringsfunktioner: Tillbehörshylla; Bollförvaring; Kratthållare; Kritbehållare; Ersättningsklämmor för köer; Mugghållare; Hållare för niobollstriangel; Poängtavla; Hållare för triangel; Annat
hu: Integrált tárolási funkciók: Tartozékpolc; Golyótartó; Hídtartó kampó; Krétatartó; Pótdákótartó-csipeszek; Italtartó; 9-es golyókerettartó; Eredményjelző tábla; Háromszög alakú kerettartó; Egyéb
sl-SI: Integrirane funkcije shranjevanja: Polica za pripomočke; Prostor za shranjevanje krogel; Kljuka za mostiček; Držalo za kredo; Nadomestne sponke za palice; Držalo za pijačo; Držalo za trikotnik (devetka); Semafor; Držalo za trikotnik; Drugo
lt-LT: Integruotos laikymo savybės: Priedų lentyna; Kamuoliukų dėklas; Lazdos atramos kabliukas; Kreidelės laikiklis; Biliardo lazdų laikiklių pakaitalai; Gėrimų laikiklis; Devynių kamuoliukų rėmo laikiklis; Švieslentė; Trikampio rėmo laikiklis; Kita
th: คุณสมบัติการจัดเก็บในตัว: ชั้นวางอุปกรณ์เสริม; ที่เก็บลูก; ตะขอแขวนไม้เรสต์; ที่เก็บชอล์ก; คลิปหนีบไม้คิวอะไหล่; ที่วางแก้วน้ำ; ที่เก็บแร็ค 9 ลูก; กระดานคะแนน; ที่เก็บแร็คสามเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
it: Funzionalità di stoccaggio integrate: Ripiano per accessori; Vano portapalline; Gancio per ponte; Portagesso; Clip fermastecca di ricambio; Portabicchieri; Portatriangolo per palla 9; Segnapunti; Portatriangolo; Altro
sk-SK: Funkcie integrovaného úložného priestoru: Polica na príslušenstvo; Úložný priestor na gule; Háčik na mostík; Držiak na kriedu; Náhradné svorky na tága; Držiak na nápoje; Držiak na rám pre 9 gúľ; Výsledková tabuľa; Držiak na trojuholník; Iné
cs: Integrované úložné funkce: Police na příslušenství; Úložný prostor na koule; Háček na hrabičky; Držák na křídu; Náhradní svorky na tága; Držák na nápoje; Držák na stavítko pro devítku; Výsledková tabule; Držák na trojúhelníkové stavítko; Jiné
nl: Geïntegreerde opberg kenmerken: Accessoireschap; Ballenopslag; Bridgehaak; Krijthouder; Vervangende keuclips; Bekerhouder; Houder voor 9-ball-rek; Scorebord; Houder voor triangelrek; Overig
el: Ενσωματωμένες λειτουργίες αποθήκευσης: Ράφι αξεσουάρ; Αποθήκευση μπαλών; Γάντζος γέφυρας; Θήκη κιμωλίας; Ανταλλακτικά κλιπ στέκας; Ποτηροθήκη; Θήκη τριγώνου για εννιάμπαλο; Πίνακας σκορ; Θήκη τριγώνου; Άλλο
hr-HR: Integrirane značajke pohrane: Polica za dodatke; Spremište za loptice; Kuka za most; Držač za kredu; Zamjenske kopče za štapove; Držač za piće; Držač trokuta za 9-ball; Semafor s rezultatima; Držač trokuta za biljar; Ostalo
ko: 통합 스토리지 기능: 액세서리 선반; 당구공 보관함; 브리지 후크; 초크 홀더; 교체용 큐 클립; 음료 홀더; 나인볼 랙 홀더; 점수판; 트라이앵글 랙 홀더; 기타
de: Integrierte Aufbewahrungsfunktionen: Zubehörregal; Ballaufbewahrung; Hilfsqueue-Haken; Kreidehalter; Ersatz-Queue-Clips; Getränkehalter; 9-Ball-Rack-Halter; Zähltafel; Dreieckhalter; Sonstige
es: Características de almacenamiento integradas: Estante para accesorios; Almacenamiento de bolas; Gancho de puente; Soporte para tiza; Repuestos de clips para tacos; Soporte para bebidas; Soporte para triángulo de bola nueve; Marcador; Soporte para triángulo; Otro
ro-RO: Funcții de stocare integrate: Raft pentru accesorii; Spațiu de depozitare bile; Cârlig pentru prelungitor (bridge); Suport pentru cretă; Cleme de schimb pentru tacuri; Suport pentru băuturi; Suport pentru triunghi de 9 bile; Tabelă de marcaj; Suport pentru triunghi; Altele
fr: Caractéristiques de rangement intégrées: Étagère à accessoires; Rangement pour billes; Crochet pour repose-queue; Porte-craie; Attaches de rechange pour queues; Porte-boisson; Porte-losange; Tableau des scores; Porte-triangle; Autre